Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB17.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding KRS 157.420, during fiscal year 2026-2027
and fiscal year 2027-2028, each local school district shall provide all certified employees,
except superintendents, a single payment of $2,000 in each fiscal year. The single
payment shall be issued to certified employees not later than August 31 of each fiscal
year, and shall be in addition to any normal rank and step increase attained by certified
personnel employed by local school districts.
(2) During fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028, each local school
district shall provide all classified employees a single payment of $1,000 in each fiscal
year. The single payment shall be issued to classified employees not later than August 31
of each fiscal year, and shall be in addition to any normal step increase or any increase
that might result from assuming new duties or obtaining additional qualifications.
(3) There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$153,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund account established by KRS 48.705 to the Learning and Results
Services budget unit to provide the payments set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. If the appropriation is insufficient to provide the payments set forth in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the Department of Education is authorized to pro
rata reduce the payments.
Section 2. Whereas this Act provides for specific payments to school district
personnel, it is essential that this Act take effect prior to the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium,
therefor an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and
approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/6/2026 9:27 AM Jacketed